Tennessee, session 114, SB2083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-201(23)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) "Home for the aged" means a home represented and held out to the general
public as a home that primarily accepts an aged person for relatively permanent,
domiciliary care and provides room, board, and personal services and that is categorized
as either a tier 1 home for the aged or a tier 2 home for the aged as follows:
(i) A home for the aged that houses five (5) or fewer nonrelated persons
is a tier 1 home for the aged; and
(ii) A home for the aged that houses six (6) or more nonrelated persons
is a tier 2 home for the aged;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2083
011275
- 1 -